Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,115
Shareholders information; applicability of sections; insurer, file documents with director.

Sections 44-3,115 to 44-3,118 shall apply to all domestic stock insurers having one hundred or more shareholders, except that such sections shall not apply to any insurer if ninety-five percent or more of its stock is owned or controlled by a parent or an affiliated insurer and the remaining shares are held by less than five hundred shareholders. A domestic stock insurer which files with the Securities and Exchange Commission forms of proxies, consents, and authorizations complying with the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Securities Exchange Act amendments of 1964, and the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission promulgated thereunder shall file copies of all such documents with the Director of Insurance on the same date such documents are filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.

Laws 1965, c. 249, § 1, p. 706;

Laws 1969, c. 369, § 1, p. 1310;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 112.